rus.twoc
Alphabet

%[cross%]:0
%[noun%]:0
%.root:%.root
;

Rules

"Crosspos no more than once"
%[cross%]:0 <=> [ : - %[cross%]:0 ]* _ [ : - %[cross%]:0 ]* ;
! %[cross%]:0 /<= %[cross%]:0 :* _ ;
![ : - %[cross%]:0 ]* _ [ : - %[cross%]:0 ]* ;


"No more than two noun suffixes"
%[noun%]:0 <=> ( %[noun%]:0 ) [ : - %[noun%]:0 ]* _ [ : - %[noun%]:0 ]* ;
                [ : - %[noun%]:0 ]* _ [ : - %[noun%]:0 ]* ( %[noun%]:0 ) ;
